Illinois, session 104th, SB3420.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 210.5 and by adding Section 210.10 as 6follows: 7    (35 ILCS 5/210.5)8    Sec. 210.5. Tax credit for employee child care. 9    (a) Each corporate taxpayer is entitled to a credit 10against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 11201 in an amount equal to (i) for taxable years ending on or 12after December 31, 2000 and on or before December 31, 2004, and 13for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2007, and for 14taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2026, 30% of the 15start-up costs expended by the corporate taxpayer to provide a 16child care facility for the children of its employees, and 17(ii) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2000 and 18on or before December 31, 2025, 5% of the annual amount paid by 19the corporate taxpayer in providing the child care facility 20for the children of its employees, and (iii) for taxable years 21ending after December 31, 2025, 10% of the annual amount paid 22by the corporate taxpayer in providing the child care facility 23for the children of its employees. The provisions of Section   SB3420- 2 -LRB104 18892 HLH 32337 b1250 do not apply to the credits allowed under this Section. If 2the 5% credit authorized under item (ii) of this subsection is 3claimed, the 5% credit authorized under Section 210 cannot 4also be claimed.5    To receive the tax credit under this Section a corporate 6taxpayer may either independently provide and operate a child 7care facility for the children of its employees or it may join 8in a partnership with one or more other corporations to 9jointly provide and operate a child care facility for the 10children of employees of the corporations in the partnership.11    (b) The tax credit may not reduce the taxpayer's liability 12to less than zero. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the 13tax liability for the year, the excess may be carried forward 14and applied to the tax liability of the 5 taxable years 15following the excess credit year. The credit must be applied 16to the earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If 17there are credits from more than one tax year that are 18available to offset a liability, then the earlier credit must 19be applied first.20    (c) As used in this Section, "start-up costs" means 21planning, site-preparation, construction, renovation, or 22acquisition of a child care facility. As used in this Section, 23"child care facility" is limited to a child care facility 24located in Illinois.25    (d) A corporate taxpayer claiming the credit provided by 26this Section shall maintain and record such information as the   SB3420- 3 -LRB104 18892 HLH 32337 b1Department may require by rule regarding the child care 2facility for which the credit is claimed.3(Source: P.A. 95-648, eff. 10-11-07.) 4    (35 ILCS 5/210.10 new)5    Sec. 210.10. Federal enhanced tax credit for 6employer-provided child care.7    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 82026, each corporate taxpayer that is a qualified small 9business is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by 10subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 1110% of the federal tax credit claimed by the corporate 12taxpayer for the taxable year for qualified child care 13expenditures under Section 45F of the Internal Revenue Code. 14    (b) A taxpayer may not claim both the credit under Section 15210.5 of this Act and the credit under this Section for the 16same expenditure. 17    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 18the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 19the tax credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the 20excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability 21of the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 22credit must be applied to the earliest year for which there is 23a tax liability. If there are credits from more than one tax 24year that are available to offset a liability, then the 25earlier credit must be applied first.   SB3420- 4 -LRB104 18892 HLH 32337 b1    (d) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 2implement and administer this Section. 3    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 4250 of this Act. 5    (f) As used in this Section: 6    "Qualified child care expenditure" means an expenditure 7that is paid or incurred:8        (1) to acquire, construct, rehabilitate, or expand 9    property:10            (A) that is to be used by the Illinois taxpayer as 11        part of a qualified child care facility in Illinois;12            (B) with respect to which a deduction for 13        depreciation (or amortization in lieu of depreciation) 14        is allowable; and15            (C) that does not constitute part of the principal 16        residence of the taxpayer or any employee of the 17        taxpayer;18        (2) for the operating costs of a qualified child care 19    facility of the taxpayer, including costs related to the 20    training of employees, costs for scholarship programs, and 21    the costs of providing increased compensation to employees 22    with higher levels of child care training; or23        (3) under a contract with a qualified child care 24    facility to provide child care services to employees of 25    the taxpayer, or under a contract with an intermediate 26    entity that contracts with one or more qualified child   SB3420- 5 -LRB104 18892 HLH 32337 b1    care facilities to provide those child care services.2    "Qualified child care expenditures" does not include 3expenses in excess of the fair market value of the care. 4    "Qualified child care facility" has the same meaning given 5to that term in Section 45F of the federal Internal Revenue 6Code. 7    "Qualified small business" has the same meaning given to 8that term in Section 45F of the Internal Revenue Code.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.